District of Columbia statutes.
10-511.05

Tunnel under Capitol Grounds and Botanic Garden grounds — United States not to incur expense or liability.

Except as provided in § 10-511.06, the United States shall not incur any expense or liability whatsoever under or by reason of this subchapter, or be liable under any claim of any nature or kind that may arise from the construction, or the operation or maintenance, of that portion of the tunnel authorized by this subchapter.

July 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 334, Pub. L. 88-381, § 5
1981 Ed., § 9-139.
1973 Ed., § 9-143.